Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Chapter 9. Enforcement of Subtitle II; Jurisdiction

§ 28.2-900.
Arrest with or without warrant; larceny; violations of boating laws and Title 62.1.

Officers may, with or without warrant, (i) arrest any person violating any provision of this subtitle, (ii) seize any net, pot, or other fishing device or gear used in violating such laws and (iii) seize fish, shellfish or marine organisms taken or handled in violation of this subtitle. Each seized property shall be forfeited to the Commonwealth. The forfeiture shall be enforced as provided in Chapter 22.1 (§

19.2-386.1

et seq.) of Title 19.2. The officer seizing the property to be forfeited shall immediately give notice to the attorney for the Commonwealth.

All officers may arrest, with or without a warrant, any person who commits in his presence (i) any larceny committed upon or adjacent to the waters of the Commonwealth, (ii) any violation of the provisions of Chapter 7 of Title 29.1, or any regulations promulgated thereunder, or (iii) any violation of the provisions of Chapter 18 (§

62.1-187

et seq.) or 20 (§

62.1-194

et seq.) of Title 62.1.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 28-206, 28-208; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-185; 1980, c. 567, § 28.1-185.1; 1981, c. 525; 1987, c. 84; 1992, c. 836; 2012, cc. 283, 756.

Cross references.

As to the Line of Duty Act, see §

9.1-400

. As to arrest without warrant in certain cases, see §

19.2-81

.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 283 and 756 are identical, and substituted “Chapter 22.1 (§

19.2-386.1

et seq.)” for “Chapter 22 (§

19.2-369

et seq.)” in the third sentence of subsection A.

§ 28.2-901.
Summons issued instead of being taken into custody; failure to appear.

Whenever any person is detained by or is in the custody of an arresting officer for any violation of the laws enforceable pursuant to §

28.2-900

, the arresting officer shall take the name and address of each person detained and issue a summons or otherwise notify him in writing to appear at a time and court to be specified in the summons or notice. When the person gives his written promise to appear at the designated time and place, the officer shall immediately release him from custody.

If the arresting officer (i) believes a detained person is likely to disregard a summons issued under the provisions of this section or (ii) reasonably believes a detained person is likely to harm himself or another, or if the person refuses to give his written promise to appear, the officer may take the offender, vessel and property into custody. The person shall be brought before the nearest or most accessible judicial officer or other person qualified to admit bail having jurisdiction.

The failure of any person to appear as required by a summons issued under the provisions of this section shall suspend all licenses issued to the person pursuant to this subtitle until such time as he appears to answer the charges against him. Failure to appear shall bar the issuance of any further license to the person until he appears.

History.

1983, c. 591, § 28.1-185.2; 1992, c. 836.

§ 28.2-902.
Procedure after arrest and seizure.

Any person arrested may be (i) taken before a court of competent jurisdiction for trial, (ii) committed to jail pending trial, (iii) admitted to bail or released on recognizance as provided by general law, or (iv) issued a summons requiring him to appear for trial.
The time specified in the summons shall not be less than five days from the date of arrest unless such person requests an earlier hearing. Any person failing to appear as directed in the summons shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, regardless of the disposition of, and in addition to, the charge upon which he was originally arrested.
If the person fails to appear, a warrant for his arrest may be issued.

Any property seized under the provisions of subsection A of §

28.2-900

may be held by the officer or other official who made the seizure, pending final outcome of the legal proceedings.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-209; 1950, p. 978; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-186; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 28.2-903.
Violations constitute misdemeanor.

A violation of any provision of this subtitle or regulation promulgated thereunder, unless otherwise specifically provided, is a Class 3 misdemeanor. A second or subsequent violation of any provision of this subtitle or regulation promulgated thereunder committed by the same person within twelve months of a prior violation is a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1962, c. 406, § 28.1-187; 1989, c. 421; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 and 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 28.2-903.1.
Impeding lawful fishing in tidal waters; penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to willfully and intentionally impede the lawful fishing of any species of fish or shellfish. “Fishing” means those activities defined in §

28.2-100

as “fishing,” “fisheries” or “to fish.”

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1997, c. 703.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 28.2-904.
Pursuit and detention across the Maryland-Virginia line.

When, in the opinion of the legally constituted authorities of the Commonwealth, there has occurred on the waters of Virginia a violation of the laws of the Commonwealth enforceable pursuant to §

28.2-900

, or when, in the opinion of the legally constituted authorities of Maryland, there has occurred on the waters of Maryland a violation of any provision of the Natural Resources Article, Annotated Code of Maryland, the offender may be pursued by the legally constituted authorities of the state where the offense was committed up to and across the Maryland-Virginia boundary into the state where the offender flees. If a capture is made in continuous pursuit, the offender, vessel and property shall be dealt with as authorized by the laws of the state where the offense was committed.

The provisions of this section shall be effective as long as the State of Maryland has in force similar provisions authorizing legally constituted authorities of Virginia to make pursuit and arrests in Maryland for violations of the laws of Virginia.

History.

1983, c. 323, § 28.1-188.1; 1992, c. 836.

§ 28.2-905.
Resistance to officer or authorized person, etc.; penalty.

Any person found guilty of resisting or impeding an officer or other person authorized to make arrests, seizures, examinations or other performances of duties under this subtitle, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-215; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-191; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 28.2-906.
Failure to perform duty; penalty.

The failure of any officer or other person to perform any duty required of him by any provision of this subtitle is a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-216; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-192; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 28.2-907.
Jurisdiction of courts.

Any proceeding under any section of this subtitle shall be before a court of competent jurisdiction in the county or city (i) in which the offense was committed or (ii) adjacent to the waters in which the offense was committed.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-218; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-193; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to jurisdiction of circuit courts over watercourses generally, see §

17.1-516

.